Utah statutes.
61-2-1.   License required.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person to engage in the business, act in the
capacity of, advertise, or assume to act as a principal real estate broker,
associate real estate broker, or a real estate sales agent within this state
without a license obtained under this chapter.
(2)  It is unlawful for any person outside the state to engage in the
business, act in the capacity of, advertise, or assume to act as a principal
real estate broker, associate real estate broker, or a real estate sales agent
with respect to real estate located within the state without a license
obtained under this chapter.
